Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-290
Judicial review; transcript of record and proceedings; responsive pleading not required.

Within fifteen days after service of the petition under section 79-289 or within such further time as the court for good cause shown may allow, the school board or board of education shall prepare and transmit to the court a certified transcript of the record which shall include the rules and regulations of the school board relied upon by the school district in its determination to suspend, reassign, or expel the student and the proceedings conducted before it, including the final decision sought to be reversed, vacated, or modified. The school board need not file any responsive pleading.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 34;

Laws 1983, LB 209, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 40;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,203;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 94.